Tennessee, session 114, SB2569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-603, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(j) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary, on or before June
30 of each year, the treasurer shall allocate and deposit ten percent (10%) of the
investment income earned by the pooled investment fund in that fiscal year to the state
highway fund.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2569
012034
- 1 -